Connecticut, session 2026, HB05477.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 18-81cc of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) As used in this section, "sexual abuse" has the same meaning as
4 provided in 28 CFR 115.6, as amended from time to time. Any agency of
5 the state or any political subdivision of the state that incarcerates or
6 detains adult or juvenile offenders, including persons detained for
7 immigration violations, shall [, within available appropriations,] adopt
8 and comply with the applicable standards recommended by the
9 National Prison Rape Elimination Commission for the prevention,
10 detection and monitoring of, and response to, sexual abuse in adult
11 prisons and jails, community correctional centers, juvenile facilities and
12 lockups.
13 (b) Such standards include, but are not limited to:
14 (1) Zero tolerance of sexual abuse or written or verbal threats of
15 sexual abuse;
16 (2) Contracting with other entities for the confinement of inmates or
LCO 1 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
17 detainees;
18 (3) Inmate or detainee supervision;
19 (4) Heightened protection for vulnerable inmates or detainees;
20 (5) [Limits to cross-gender] Privacy limits on viewing and searches of
21 individuals who have a gender identity that differs from the inmate's
22 assigned sex at birth;
23 (6) Accommodating inmates or detainees with special needs;
24 (7) Hiring and promotion decisions;
25 (8) Assessment, [and] use and implementation of monitoring
26 technology, to ensure there are no areas that are not subject to video
27 surveillance, unless otherwise prohibited by law;
28 (9) Evidence protocol and forensic medical examinations;
29 (10) Agreements with outside public entities and community service
30 providers, including, but not limited to, for purposes of ensuring access
31 to crisis and emotional support services and ongoing mental health
32 support and treatments;
33 (11) Agreements with outside law enforcement agencies for purposes
34 of conducting investigations;
35 (12) Agreements with the prosecuting authority;
36 (13) Employee training;
37 (14) Volunteer and contractor training;
38 (15) Inmate education;
39 (16) Detainee, inmate, attorney [,] and contractor [and inmate worker]
40 notification of agency's zero-tolerance policy;
41 (17) Specialized training: Investigations and internal administrative
LCO 2 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
42 investigations;
43 (18) Specialized training: Medical and mental health care, including
44 trauma-informed methods of care for victims of sexual abuse;
45 (19) Screening for risk of victimization and abusiveness;
46 (20) Use of screening information for inmate classification,
47 management and treatment;
48 (21) Inmate or detainee reporting;
49 (22) Exhaustion of administrative remedies;
50 (23) Inmate access to outside confidential support services or legal
51 representation with no interference from the Department of Correction;
52 (24) Third-party reporting;
53 (25) Staff and facility or agency head reporting duties;
54 (26) Reporting to other confinement facilities;
55 (27) Staff first responder duties;
56 (28) Coordinated response;
57 (29) Agency protection against retaliation;
58 (30) Duty to investigate;
59 (31) Duty to intervene;
60 [(31)] (32) Criminal and administrative agency investigations;
61 [(32)] (33) Evidence standard for administrative investigations;
62 [(33)] (34) Disciplinary sanctions for staff, including, but not limited
63 to, for any delay in investigating;
64 [(34) Disciplinary] (35) Graduated disciplinary sanctions for inmates
LCO 3 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
65 who are the aggressor for which the agency has substantiated
66 allegations against the inmate who is the aggressor;
67 [(35)] (36) Referrals for prosecution for staff-on-inmate, inmate-on-
68 inmate or detainee-on-detainee sexual abuse;
69 [(36)] (37) Medical and mental health screenings: History of sexual
70 abuse, assault, trauma and victimization;
71 [(37)] (38) Access to emergency medical and mental health services;
72 [(38)] (39) Ongoing medical and mental health care for sexual abuse
73 victims and abusers;
74 [(39)] (40) Sexual abuse incident reviews;
75 [(40)] (41) Data collection;
76 [(41)] (42) Data review for corrective action;
77 [(42)] (43) Data storage, publication, and destruction; and
78 [(43)] (44) Audits of standards.
79 (c) The agency head of any agency of the state or the chief elected
80 official or governing legislative body of any political subdivision of the
81 state that incarcerates or detains juvenile offenders shall, annually, not
82 later than January fifteenth, certify its compliance with the provisions of
83 subsections (a) and (b) of this section to the Criminal Justice Policy and
84 Planning Division within the Office of Policy and Management.
85 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Correction
86 shall ensure that all incidents of sexual abuse or sexual assault that
87 occurred within a correctional institution are investigated and such
88 investigation is completed not later than thirty days after the report is
89 received by any employee or contractor of the Department of
90 Correction. Not later than October 1, 2026, and quarterly thereafter, the
91 Commissioner of Correction shall report, in accordance with the
92 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, any such incidents
LCO 4 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
93 that were not reported within thirty days after the incident occurred or
94 where the investigation of such report was not completed within thirty
95 days, to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
96 cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary and government
97 oversight.
98 Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) On or before July 1, 2026, the
99 Commissioner of Correction shall submit a plan for the training of
100 correctional officers concerning the use of body scanning machines to
101 the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
102 cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary and government
103 oversight. Any such plan shall ensure that such training is implemented
104 not later than January 1, 2027.
105 Sec. 4. Section 53a-71 of the general statutes is repealed and the
106 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
107 (a) A person is guilty of sexual assault in the second degree when
108 such person engages in sexual intercourse with another person and: (1)
109 Such other person is thirteen years of age or older but under sixteen
110 years of age and the actor is more than three years older than such other
111 person; or (2) such other person is impaired because of mental disability
112 or disease to the extent that such other person is unable to consent to
113 such sexual intercourse; or (3) such other person is physically helpless;
114 or (4) such other person is less than eighteen years old and the actor is
115 such person's guardian or otherwise responsible for the general
116 supervision of such person's welfare; or (5) such other person is in
117 custody of law or detained in a hospital or other institution, the actor is
118 employed by or contracted with the hospital or institution or an agency
119 of the state and the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over
120 such other person; or (6) the actor is a psychotherapist and such other
121 person is (A) a patient of the actor and the sexual intercourse occurs
122 during the psychotherapy session, (B) a patient or former patient of the
123 actor and such patient or former patient is emotionally dependent upon
124 the actor, or (C) a patient or former patient of the actor and the sexual
125 intercourse occurs by means of therapeutic deception; or (7) the actor
LCO 5 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
126 accomplishes the sexual intercourse by means of false representation
127 that the sexual intercourse is for a bona fide medical purpose by a health
128 care professional; or (8) the actor is a school employee and such other
129 person is a student enrolled in a school in which the actor works or a
130 school under the jurisdiction of the local or regional board of education
131 which employs the actor; or (9) the actor is a coach in an athletic activity
132 or a person who provides intensive, ongoing instruction and such other
133 person is a recipient of coaching or instruction from the actor and (A) is
134 a secondary school student and receives such coaching or instruction in
135 a secondary school setting, or (B) is under eighteen years of age; or (10)
136 the actor is twenty years of age or older and stands in a position of
137 power, authority or supervision over such other person by virtue of the
138 actor's professional, legal, occupational or volunteer status and such
139 other person's participation in a program or activity, and such other
140 person is under eighteen years of age; or (11) such other person is placed
141 or receiving services under the direction of the Commissioner of
142 Developmental Services in any public or private facility or program and
143 the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over such other
144 person.
145 (b) Sexual assault in the second degree is a class C felony or, if the
146 victim of the offense is under sixteen years of age, a class B felony, and
147 any person found guilty under this section shall be sentenced to a term
148 of imprisonment of which [nine months] two years of the sentence
149 imposed may not be suspended or reduced by the court.
150 Sec. 5. Section 53a-73a of the general statutes is repealed and the
151 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
152 (a) A person is guilty of sexual assault in the fourth degree when: (1)
153 Such person subjects another person to sexual contact who is (A) under
154 thirteen years of age and the actor is more than two years older than
155 such other person, or (B) thirteen years of age or older but under fifteen
156 years of age and the actor is more than three years older than such other
157 person, or (C) physically helpless, or (D) less than eighteen years old
158 and the actor is such other person's guardian or otherwise responsible
LCO 6 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
159 for the general supervision of such other person's welfare, or (E) in
160 custody of law or detained in a hospital or other institution, the actor is
161 employed by or contracted with the hospital or institution or an agency
162 of the state and the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over
163 such other person; or (2) such person subjects another person to sexual
164 contact without such other person's consent; or (3) such person engages
165 in sexual contact with a dead human body; or (4) such person is a
166 psychotherapist and subjects another person to sexual contact who is
167 (A) a patient of the actor and the sexual contact occurs during the
168 psychotherapy session, or (B) a patient or former patient of the actor and
169 such patient or former patient is emotionally dependent upon the actor,
170 or (C) a patient or former patient of the actor and the sexual contact
171 occurs by means of therapeutic deception; or (5) such person subjects
172 another person to sexual contact and accomplishes the sexual contact by
173 means of false representation that the sexual contact is for a bona fide
174 medical purpose by a health care professional; or (6) such person is a
175 school employee and subjects another person to sexual contact who is a
176 student enrolled in a school in which the actor works or a school under
177 the jurisdiction of the local or regional board of education which
178 employs the actor; or (7) such person is a coach in an athletic activity or
179 a person who provides intensive, ongoing instruction and subjects
180 another person to sexual contact who is a recipient of coaching or
181 instruction from the actor and (A) is a secondary school student and
182 receives such coaching or instruction in a secondary school setting, or
183 (B) is under eighteen years of age; or (8) such person subjects another
184 person to sexual contact and (A) the actor is twenty years of age or older
185 and stands in a position of power, authority or supervision over such
186 other person by virtue of the actor's professional, legal, occupational or
187 volunteer status and such other person's participation in a program or
188 activity, and (B) such other person is under eighteen years of age; or (9)
189 such person subjects another person to sexual contact who is placed or
190 receiving services under the direction of the Commissioner of
191 Developmental Services in any public or private facility or program and
192 the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over such other
193 person.
LCO 7 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
194 (b) Sexual assault in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor or, if
195 the victim of the offense is under sixteen years of age, a class D felony.
196 Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Not later than January 1, 2027,
197 the Department of Correction shall enter into a contract with a provider
198 to establish and maintain a confidential crisis hotline for correction
199 officers and persons who are incarcerated in a correctional institution to
200 call to report incidents of sexual violence. Not later than October 1, 2026,
201 the department shall issue a request for proposals for purposes of
202 selecting a provider outside of the department for such hotline. The
203 department shall ensure that persons who are incarcerated can access
204 such hotline at no charge, with no time limit, and confidentially without
205 the supervision of, or permission from, any employee of the Department
206 of Correction.
207 (b) Upon establishing such hotline, the department shall inform all
208 existing correction officers of such hotline and thereafter shall inform
209 any correction officers upon hiring of such hotline. The department shall
210 post posters in each correctional institution to inform persons who are
211 incarcerated how to access such hotline.
212 Sec. 7. Section 18-96a of the general statutes is repealed and the
213 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
214 (a) When assessing and subsequently providing mental health
215 services to any inmate confined in a correctional facility of the
216 Department of Correction who has been diagnosed with a mental illness
217 by a psychiatrist licensed pursuant to chapter 370, and such psychiatrist
218 has informed the department that such inmate is currently diagnosed
219 by such psychiatrist to be a danger to himself or herself or others, the
220 department shall consider the diagnosis of such psychiatrist in order to
221 appropriately assess such inmate and provide individualized, clinically
222 appropriate and culturally competent mental health services to treat
223 such inmate's condition.
224 (b) (1) The Department of Correction, in consultation with the
225 Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services, [may] shall
LCO 8 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
226 develop a program for custodial staff members to receive not less than
227 [four hours and not more than eight] ten hours of training on mental
228 health issues each year. Within available appropriations, such training
229 shall include, at a minimum: (A) Prevention of suicide and self-injury;
230 (B) recognition of signs of mental illness; (C) communication skills for
231 interacting with inmates with mental illness; and (D) alternatives to
232 disciplinary action and the use of force when dealing with inmates with
233 mental illness. Such program shall be offered: (i) Commencing on July
234 1, 2009, to all custodial staff members at one or more correctional
235 facilities designated by the Commissioner of Correction; (ii) on and after
236 July 1, 2010, to all custodial staff members at one or more additional
237 correctional facilities designated by the commissioner; and (iii) on and
238 after July 1, 2011, to all custodial staff members at one or more additional
239 correctional facilities designated by the commissioner. On and after
240 January 1, 2027, such program shall also include trauma-informed
241 interventions and practices.
242 (2) On and after [October 1, 2018] January 1, 2027, in addition to the
243 requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection, all custodial staff
244 members at each correctional facility of the Department of Correction in
245 which female inmates are confined [may, within available
246 appropriations,] shall receive not less than four hours and not more than
247 eight hours of training on gender-specific and trauma-related mental
248 health issues faced by female inmates, including, but not limited to, the
249 effects of sexual violence.
250 (c) Before the planned release of any inmate diagnosed with a mental
251 illness as provided in subsection (a) of this section from a correctional
252 facility, the Department of Correction shall collaborate with the Judicial
253 Department, the Department of Social Services and the Department of
254 Mental Health and Addiction Services, as deemed necessary and within
255 available appropriations, to assist such inmate in obtaining housing,
256 mental health treatment services, any public benefits for which the
257 inmate is eligible and employment counseling upon the inmate's
258 release.
LCO 9 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
259 (d) On February first of each year, the Commissioner of Correction
260 shall submit a report to the joint standing committees of the General
261 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary, public
262 health and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, in
263 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a. Such report shall set
264 forth (1) the number of inmates who have been determined to require
265 mental health services during the previous calendar year, and (2) a
266 description of program services provided by the Department of
267 Correction and, if applicable, its contracted health services provider.
268 Sec. 8. Section 18-81 of the general statutes is repealed and the
269 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
270 The Commissioner of Correction shall administer, coordinate and
271 control the operations of the department and shall be responsible for the
272 overall supervision and direction of all institutions, facilities and
273 activities of the department. The commissioner shall establish rules for
274 the administrative practices and custodial and rehabilitative methods of
275 said institutions and facilities in accordance with recognized
276 correctional standards. The commissioner shall establish, develop and
277 maintain noninstitutional, community-based service programs and
278 ensure that advocates from crisis centers from the region where each
279 correctional institution is located have access to persons who are
280 incarcerated to provide such services. The commissioner shall be
281 responsible for the supervision of persons released on parole by the
282 Board of Pardons and Paroles. The commissioner shall be responsible
283 for establishing disciplinary, diagnostic, classification, treatment,
284 vocational and academic education, research and statistics, training and
285 development services and programs throughout the department.
286 Subject to the provisions of chapter 67, the commissioner shall appoint
287 such professional, technical and other personnel as may be necessary for
288 the efficient operation of the department. The commissioner shall
289 organize and operate interinstitutional programs for the development
290 and training of institution and facility staffs. The commissioner shall
291 provide for the services of such chaplains as are necessary to minister to
292 the needs of the inmates of department institutions and facilities. The
LCO 10 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
293 commissioner shall, within available appropriations for such purpose,
294 arrange for provision of legal assistance of a civil nature to indigent
295 inmates of department institutions and facilities and legal
296 representation for such inmates before administrative boards where
297 permitted or constitutionally required.
298 Sec. 9. (Effective from passage) The Institute for Municipal and Regional
299 Policy at The University of Connecticut, in consultation with the
300 Criminal Justice Policy and Planning Division within the Office of Policy
301 and Management, shall conduct a staffing assessment study of
302 custodial, program and administrative employees of the Department of
303 Correction and recommend strategies to improve the management and
304 administration of the department and facility operations with a goal of
305 (1) identifying the appropriate staffing ratio relative to the number of
306 correctional institutions and centers and inmates and community
307 correction supervision programs and supervised population, (2)
308 reducing costs related to overtime, incidents of employee injury and the
309 rate of employee absenteeism, (3) improving employee health and job
310 satisfaction, and (4) aligning with correctional best practices. Not later
311 than January 1, 2027, the Institute for Municipal and Regional Policy
312 shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, in
313 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
314 to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
315 cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary and government
316 oversight.
317 Sec. 10. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) The Commissioner of
318 Correction shall jointly develop with the Institute of Municipal and
319 Regional Policy at The University of Connecticut a plan to phase in the
320 correctional culture change initiative for all current and new employees.
321 Such plan shall include, but need not be limited to, the following
322 elements: (1) Streamlining core responsibilities of staff and promoting a
323 supportive work environment to reduce burnout and enhance morale,
324 (2) implementing dynamic security principles to cultivate positive staff-
325 to-persons who are incarcerated individual relationships, leading to a
326 reduction in incidents and a safer environment, (3) introducing and
LCO 11 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
327 managing programs and activities that mirror life outside of prison,
328 improving the overall atmosphere and preparing persons who are
329 incarcerated for reintegration into society, and (4) assessing and
330 supporting the progress of persons who are incarcerated, particularly
331 those with a history of problematic behavior, through targeted
332 interventions and resources. Not later than January 1, 2027, the
333 Department of Correction shall submit a preliminary plan to the joint
334 standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
335 matters relating to the judiciary and government oversight, in
336 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
337 (b) The plan developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall
338 include, but need not be limited to: (1) Training for all new employees
339 at the Department of Correction training academy, (2) in-service
340 training for current and future employees, (3) reduction in the use of
341 lock-down procedures as a management tool, (4) reduction in the rates
342 of employee absenteeism, overtime and injury, (5) policies and
343 procedures for improving outcomes for the Department of Correction
344 employees and persons who are incarcerated, and (6) ongoing process
345 and outcome evaluation and assessment.
346 (c) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter until
347 January 1, 2032, the Commissioner of Correction and the Institute for
348 Municipal and Regional Policy shall report on the implementation and
349 outcomes of the correctional culture change initiative to the joint
350 standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
351 matters relating to the judiciary and government oversight, in
352 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
353 Sec. 11. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
354 (1) "Person who is incarcerated" means a person in the custody of the
355 Department of Correction and confined in a correctional institution;
356 (2) "Correctional institution" means a prison or jail under the
357 jurisdiction of the Department of Correction;
LCO 12 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
358 (3) "Detainee" means a person who is under the age of twenty-one
359 years and detained in a juvenile facility under the jurisdiction of the
360 Department of Correction or the Judicial Branch;
361 (4) "Sexual contact" means any contact with the intimate parts of a
362 person for the purpose of sexual gratification of the actor or for the
363 purpose of degrading or humiliating such person or any contact of the
364 intimate parts of the actor with a person for the purpose of sexual
365 gratification of the actor or for the purpose of degrading or humiliating
366 such person;
367 (5) "Sexual abuse" means any sexual contact between a person who is
368 incarcerated or a detainee and an employee of the Department of
369 Correction, regardless of such person's or detainee's ability to consent;
370 and
371 (6) "Sexual assault" means any act that constitutes a violation of
372 section 53a-70b of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to
373 January 1, 2019, or section 53a-70, 53a-70a, 53a-71, as amended by this
374 act, 53a-72a, 53a-72b or 53a-73a of the general statutes, as amended by
375 this act.
376 (b) Any Department of Correction employee who, while acting in
377 such employee's official capacity, witnesses another Department of
378 Correction employee use what the witnessing employee objectively
379 knows to be sexual abuse or sexual assault toward a person who is
380 incarcerated or a detainee shall intervene and attempt to stop such other
381 employee. Any such witnessing employee who fails to intervene and
382 attempt to stop such sexual abuse or sexual assault may be prosecuted
383 and punished for the same acts in accordance with the provisions of
384 section 53a-8 of the general statutes as the employee who sexually
385 abused or sexually assaulted a person who is incarcerated or a detainee.
386 (c) Any employee who witnesses an incident of sexual abuse or
387 sexual assault described in subsection (b) of this section shall report, as
388 soon as is practicable, such incident to the Department of Correction.
389 Any employee required to report such an incident who fails to do so
LCO 13 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
390 may be prosecuted and punished in accordance with the provisions of
391 sections 53a-165 to 53a-167, inclusive, of the general statutes.
392 Immediately upon receiving such a report, the Commissioner of
393 Correction shall report such incident to the nearest local law
394 enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the incident.
395 (d) The Department of Correction may not take any retaliatory
396 personnel action or discriminate against such employee who intervenes
397 in an incident of sexual abuse or sexual assault pursuant to subsection
398 (b) of this section or reports such incident pursuant to subsection (c) of
399 this section because such employee made such report and such
400 intervening or reporting correctional employee shall be protected by the
401 provisions of section 4-61dd of the general statutes or section 31-51m of
402 the general statutes, as applicable.
403 (e) The Department of Correction shall create and maintain a record
404 detailing any incident of sexual abuse or sexual assault (1) reported
405 pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, or (2) otherwise made known
406 to the department during which a department employee sexually
407 abused or sexually assaulted a person who is incarcerated or detained.
408 Such record shall include, but not be limited to: The name of the
409 employee, the time and place of the incident, a description of what
410 occurred during the incident and, to the extent known, the names of the
411 victims and witnesses present at such incident, the results of any
412 investigation conducted and any corrective action taken by the
413 department.
414 (f) Not later than February 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
415 Department of Correction shall prepare and submit a report concerning
416 incidents described in subsection (e) of this section during the preceding
417 calendar year to the Criminal Justice Policy and Planning Division
418 within the Office of Policy and Management. Such report shall include
419 the records described in subsection (e) of this section and shall be
420 submitted electronically using a standardized method and form
421 disseminated by the division. The standardized method and form shall
422 allow compilation of statistics on each incident of sexual abuse or sexual
LCO 14 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
423 assault, including, but not limited to, (1) the race and gender of the
424 alleged victim of the sexual abuse or sexual assault, provided the
425 identification of such characteristics shall be based on the observation
426 and perception of the employee, (2) the number of times such victim was
427 sexually abused or sexually assaulted, and (3) any injury suffered by
428 such alleged victim. The Department of Correction shall, prior to
429 submission of any such report pursuant to this subsection, redact any
430 information from such report that may identify a minor, witness or
431 victim.
432 (g) The Office of Policy and Management shall, within available
433 appropriations, review incidents of sexual abuse or sexual assault
434 reported pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. Not later than
435 December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the office shall report, in
436 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
437 the results of any such review, including any recommendations, to the
438 Governor and the chairpersons and ranking members of the joint
439 standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
440 matters relating to the judiciary and government oversight.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 18-81cc
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 from passage New section
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 53a-71
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 53a-73a
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 18-96a
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 18-81
Sec. 9 from passage New section
Sec. 10 from passage New section
Sec. 11 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 10(a), "program" was changed to "plan" for consistency, in
Section 10(b)(3), "procedures" was added for clarity, in Section 10(c),
LCO 15 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 5477
"Department" was changed to "Commissioner" for consistency, in
Section 11(b), "employee" was changed to "witnessing employee" and
"attempt to stop" was added for clarity, in Section 11(b) and (e) to (g),
inclusive, references to "sexual contact" were deleted as duplicative of
the definition of "sexual abuse" in said section, and in Section 11(c) to
(e), inclusive, "incident" was changed to "incident of sexual abuse or
sexual assault" for clarity.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 16 of 16